nl: Kiemen presentatie: Levend kweekpotje; Microgroenten; Poeder; Scheuten; Kiemzaden; Kiemgroenten; Overige
hr-HR: Prezentacija klica: Teglica za uzgoj; Mikrozelenje; Prah; Izdanci; Sjemenke za klijanje; Klice; Ostalo
zh-TW: 芽菜呈現方式: 鮮活栽培盆; 微型蔬菜; 粉末; 嫩芽; 發芽種子; 芽菜; 其他
sl-SI: Predstavitev kalčkov: Lonec z živo rastlino; Mikrozelenje; Prah; Poganjki; Semena za kalitev; Kalčki; Drugo
en: Sprout presentation: Live grow pot; Microgreens; Powder; Shoots; Sprouting seeds; Sprouts; Other
bg-BG: Представяне на кълнове: Саксия с живи растения; Микрорастения; Прах; Филизи; Семена за покълване; Кълнове; Друго
pt-PT: Apresentação dos rebentos: Vaso de cultivo vivo; Microvegetais; Pó; Rebentos; Sementes para germinar; Germinados; Outro
nb: Spirepresentasjon: Voksepotte; Mikrogrønt; Pulver; Skudd; Spirefrø; Spirer; Annet
ja: スプラウトの提供形態: 栽培ポット; マイクログリーン; パウダー; シュート; スプラウト種子; スプラウト; その他
es: Presentación del brote: Maceta de cultivo vivo; Microbrotes; Polvo; Tallos; Semillas para germinar; Brotes; Otro
th: ลักษณะการนำเสนอผลิตภัณฑ์ต้นอ่อ: กระถางเพาะปลูก; ไมโครกรีน; ผง; ต้นอ่อน; เมล็ดสำหรับเพาะงอก; ถั่วงอก/ต้นอ่อน; อื่นๆ
ko: 새싹 제공 형태: 생장 화분; 마이크로그린; 분말; 어린 순; 발아 씨앗; 새싹; 기타
hu: Csíra megjelenési formája: Élő csíra (cserépben); Mikrozöldek; Por; Hajtások; Csíráztatni való magvak; Csírák; Egyéb
vi: Bài thuyết trình về mầm cây: Trồng trong chậu; Rau mầm non (Microgreens); Bột; Chồi; Hạt giống nảy mầm; Rau mầm; Khác
el: Μορφή παρουσίασης βλαστών: Ζωντανό σε γλάστρα; Μικρολαχανικά; Σκόνη; Βλαστοί; Σπόροι για φύτρωμα; Φύτρα; Άλλο
pl: Wygląd kiełków: Żywa roślina w doniczce; Mikroliście; Proszek; Pędy; Nasiona na kiełki; Kiełki; Inne
pt-BR: Broto apresentação: Vaso de cultivo vivo; Microverdes; Em pó; Hastes; Sementes para germinação; Brotos; Outro
de: Präsentationsform der Sprossen: Anzuchttopf; Microgreens; Pulver; Triebe; Keimsaat; Sprossen; Sonstige
sv: Presentation av groddar: Levande odlingskruka; Mikrogrönt; Pulver; Skott; Groddfrön; Groddar; Övrigt
cs: Prezentace klíčků: Živý pěstební květináč; Microgreens; Prášek; Výhonky; Semínka na klíčení; Klíčky; Jiné
tr: Filiz sunum şekli: Canlı yetiştirme saksısı; Mikro yeşillikler; Toz; Sürgünler; Çimlendirme tohumları; Filizler; Diğer
fi: Itujen esillepano: Elävä kasvatusruukku; Mikrovihannekset; Jauhe; Versot; Idätyssiemenet; Idut; Muu
ro-RO: Formă de prezentare a germenilor: Ghiveci cu plante vii; Microplante; Pudră; Lăstari; Semințe pentru germinat; Germeni; Altele
sk-SK: Prezentácia klíčkov: Kvetináč so živými rastlinami; Mikrobylinky; Prášok; Výhonky; Semená na klíčenie; Klíčky; Iné
fr: Présentation des pousses: Pot de culture vivant; Micro-pousses; Poudre; Pousses; Graines à germer; Germes; Autre
it: Presentazione dei germogli: Vaso di coltivazione vivo; Micro-ortaggi; Polvere; Piantine; Semi da germogliare; Germogli; Altro
zh-CN: 芽苗产品形态: 鲜活芽苗盆栽; 微型蔬菜; 芽苗粉; 嫩芽; 催芽种子; 豆芽; 其他
da: Præsentation af spirer: Levende voksepotte; Mikrogrønt; Pulver; Skud; Spirefrø; Spirer; Andet
ru: Форма представления проростков: В горшке; Микрозелень; Порошок; Побеги; Семена для проращивания; Проростки; Другое
lt-LT: Daigų pateikimo forma: Auginamas vazonėlyje; Žalumynai; Milteliai; Ūgliai; Daiginimo sėklos; Daigai; Kita